src/fst/morphology/stems/particles.lexc
LEXICON Particles
!!! Common
! Singular
ang+Pcle+Dir:ang # ; ! Direct
og+Pcle+Idr:og # ; ! Indirect
sa+Pcle+Obl:sa # ; ! Oblique
! Plural
! angmgá+Pcle:mgá # ; ! Direct
! ogmgá+Pcle:mgá # ; ! Indirect
! samgá+Pcle:mgá # ; ! Oblique
mga+Pcle+Pl:mga # ; ! Pluralizer

!!! Personal
! Singular
si+Pcle+Dir:si # ; ! Direct
ni+Pcle+Idr:ni # ; ! Indirect
kang+Pcle+Obl:kang # ; ! Oblique
! Singular
silá+Pcle+Dir:silá # ; ! Direct
nilá+Pcle+Idr:nilá # ; ! Indirect
kanila+Pcle+Obl:kanila # ; ! Oblique
